src/morphology/compounds.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ==========================================================================
!                     North Sámi morphological analyser                     
! ==========================================================================


! Prefixing and compounding
! =========================

LEXICON Prefixes
          ii%-+Use/Circ:ii%-             Noun       ;
          ii%-+Use/Circ:ii%-             Adjective  ; ! ii-biologalaš 
       Lulle%-+Use/Circ:Lul^le%-         ProperNoun ; ! Lulli-Trøndelaga etc.
       Lulli%-+Use/Circ:Lul^li%-         ProperNoun ;
 Lullinuorta%-+Use/Circ:Lul^li^nuor^ta%- ProperNoun ;
       Mátta%-+Use/Circ:Mát^ta%-         ProperNoun ;
       Davvi%-+Use/Circ:Dav^vi%-         ProperNoun ;
       Davve%-+Use/Circ:Dav^ve%-         ProperNoun ; ! 76 i korpus, 17 i leksikon
       Gaska%-+Use/Circ:Gas^ka%-         ProperNoun ;
      Vuolli%-+Use/Circ:Vuol^li%-        ProperNoun ;
      Vuolle%-+Use/Circ:Vuol^le%-        ProperNoun ;
       Badje%-+Use/Circ:Bad^je%-         ProperNoun ;
       Oarje%-+Use/Circ:Oar^je%-         ProperNoun ;
      Orjjel%-+Use/Circ:Orj^jel%-        ProperNoun ; ! Orjje 0 i korpus  orjjelsápmi
      Orjješ%-+Use/Circ:Orj^ješ%-        ProperNoun ;
      Nuorta%-+Use/Circ:Nuor^ta%-        ProperNoun ;
        Ođđa%-+Use/Circ:Ođ^đa%-          ProperNoun ;
         eahpe+Use/Circ:eah^pe#          Noun       ;
  eahpe+Use/NG+Use/Circ:eah^pe#          Adjective  ;
         eahpe+Use/Circ:eah^pe#          Verb       ;

!"<Jus fylkkaboazodoallostivra gávnnaha ahte>"
!"<Ođđa siidaoasi dohkkeheami biehttaleami>"

LEXICON R
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@ RAlmostReal ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RAlmostReal    ! lexicalising the 3-part compounds, with the tag ShCmp
         Rreal       ; ! Business as usual: Normal compounds right on to Rreal
 +Cmp#:# MiddleNouns ; ! These nouns should not return to themselves, to avoid -jotjotjot-
                       ! They thus point directly to Rreal.
 
LEXICON Rreal ! This is the former R lexicon, renamed to avoid the MiddleNouns loop
                     @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@#                 Noun      ; ! This is the normal case.
      @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@#  Verb      ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
      @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@#  Adjective ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation

                @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-                Noun      ; ! These 3 cases add a hyphen, so
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%- Verb      ; ! Sem-julggaštus and maana-gåetie
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Hyph+Use/Circ+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%- Adjective ; ! are allowed.

                @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+SHyph+Err/Sub+Cmp#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­                  Noun      ; ! These 3 cases add a SOFT hyphen, to
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+SHyph+Err/Sub+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­   Verb      ; ! make it possible to analyse certain texts
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+SHyph+Err/Sub+Cmp#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@­   Adjective ; ! from printing houses and newspapers.

! NB! ! ! The soft hyhens in the three last lines above are INVISIBLE! Even in SEE.
! There really IS a character in front of the space and the continuation lexicon.
! It is visible in tools like UnicodeChecker and hexadecimal editors. DO NOT EDIT
! THESE LINES WIHTOUT THE PROPER TOOLS TO CHECK THAT ALL IS CORRECT!!!

 @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-# Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
 @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-# Numeral    ; ! maana-123
 @U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-# ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for non-hyph.
                                                                                                       ! words. viessu-London goes through here.
  @U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@%-#  HyphNouns  ; ! Go to words requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-

           +RCmpnd@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@:%-@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@@C.NeedsVowRed@   ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller
                                        +Use/-Spell:                                      R-LAGAN    ;



LEXICON RHyph ! Recursive lexicon from all classes REQUIRING a hyphen to follow.
              ! NBNBNB! ! ! The hyphen should be added here! NOT in the other lexicons!
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@ RHyphTags ; ! Flags to control compounding

LEXICON RHyphTags
                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                HyphNouns  ; ! Go to nouns requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
 @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@%-# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                Acronym    ; ! maana-tv, "lomme-cd-spelar"
                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                Numeral    ; ! NRK-2
                +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.
                                                                 ! London-Hull is covered here, whereas Hull-viessu
                                                                 ! is covered by RHyph + Noun.
                         +RCmpnd:%-                 ENDLEX     ; ! This to take care of Oahpo- ja dutkandept - want this in speller

! Proper noun and other hyph word compounds WITHOUT hyphens are covered HERE
! and are marked +Err/Sub as well as +Use/NoHyph. Examples: LondonHull & viessuLondon.
! The lemma string is still given WITH the hyphen - we want identical lemma for both sub and norm.
!                +Use/Circ+Err/Sub+Use/NoHyph+Cmp%-#:#                Noun       ; ! This is the normal case.
!                +Use/Circ+Err/Sub+Use/NoHyph+Cmp%-#:#                HyphNouns  ; ! Go to nouns requiring hyphens, like -tv- and -cd-
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Err/Sub+Use/NoHyph+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@# Verb       ; ! Flag diacr declares that the compound
! @P.NeedNoun.ON@+Use/Circ+Err/Sub+Use/NoHyph+Cmp%-#:@P.NeedNoun.ON@# Adjective  ; ! needs a N tag later in the derivation
!                +Use/Circ+Err/Sub+Use/NoHyph+Cmp%-#:#                Acronym    ; ! maanatv, "lommecdspelar"
!                +Use/Circ+Err/Sub+Use/NoHyph+Cmp%-#:#                Numeral    ; ! NRK2
!                +Use/Circ+Err/Sub+Use/NoHyph+Cmp%-#:#                ProperNoun ; ! Proper nouns as the 2nd part of compounds for hyph-words.


LEXICON RNum
      +Use/Circ+Cmp%-#:%-# Noun ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 


LEXICON Rnoun
                Rreal  ; ! Going to the compound lexicon
 +Attr+Err/Sub: ENDLEX ; ! Kárášjot, as independent (sub) word

LEXICON RProp                         !!≈ !!!@CODE@
 @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@@D.CmpLast.TRUE@@D.CmpNone.TRUE@@U.CmpNone.FALSE@ RPropTags ; ! Flags to control compounding
 +Der2+Der/nammasaš+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/-Spell:%-nammas AHKASAS ; !Matikka-nammasaš

LEXICON RPropTags
                                          !!           A special lexicon for handling proper noun compounding without hyphens
                              RHyphTags ; !!≈ ; @CODE@ : This is the regular case, giving hyphens to compounds
  +Use/-Spell+Use/Circ+Cmp#:# Noun      ; !!≈ ; @CODE@ : This is the special case, going directly to nouns (''not'' to NounRoot,
                                          !!           as that would allow compounding with words explicitly coded to disallow
                                          !!           such compounds)

LEXICON flagON-R
@U.NeedsVowRed.ON@ R ;

LEXICON flagOFF-R
@U.NeedsVowRed.OFF@ R ;

LEXICON R-LAGAN
 +Der1+Der2+Der/lágan+Use/Circ+Use/-Spell:» LAGAN ; ! ! biilalágan, noaidelágán noaiddilágán beatnagalágán beanalágán all these goes
                                                      ! Nielsen: beatnatlágán, beatnatlágáš, beanalágáš, giđalágáš, áhččelágáš,
 +Der1+Der2+Der/lágaš+Use/Circ+Use/-Spell:» LAGAS ; ! ! etc.
